Utah statutes.
11-36a-704.   Mediation.

(1)  In addition to the methods of challenging an impact fee under Section 11-36a-701, a specified public agency may require a local political subdivision or private entity to participate in mediation of any applicable impact fee.

(2)  To require mediation, the specified public agency shall submit a written request for mediation to the local political subdivision or private entity.

(3)  The specified public agency may submit a request for mediation under this section at any time, but no later than 30 days after the day on which an impact fee is paid.

(4)  Upon the submission of a request for mediation under this section, the local political subdivision or private entity shall:

(a)  cooperate with the specified public agency to select a mediator; and

(b)  participate in the mediation process.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

